Maryland, session 2025, SB0725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1A–02.
(d) Only a person with a video lottery operation license issued under this subtitle
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0725*

SENATE BILL 725
may offer a video lottery terminal and table games for public use in the State under this
subtitle.
9–1A–05.
(a) The Video Lottery Facility Location Commission established under § 9–1A–36
of this subtitle may not:
(1) award more than [six] SEVEN video lottery operation licenses;
(2) award more than [16,500] 18,000 video lottery terminals for operation
at video lottery facilities in the State;
(3) subject to the requirements of § 9–1A–36(h) and (i) of this subtitle,
award more than 4,750 terminals for operation at any video lottery facility; and
(4) for a location in Allegany County:
(i) award a video lottery operation license to an applicant that does
not agree to purchase the Rocky Gap Lodge and Resort; and
(ii) notwithstanding § 9–1A–36(i)(2) of this subtitle, award more
than 1,500 video lottery terminals for operation at a video lottery facility in Allegany
County.
9–1A–36.
(f) The Video Lottery Facility Location Commission may award not more than
[six] SEVEN video lottery operation licenses to qualified applicants, through a competitive
process consistent with the process for competitive sealed proposals under Title 13 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(h) (1) In order to qualify for a video lottery operation license under this
section, a proposed video lottery facility shall be located in one of the following counties:
(i) a location in Anne Arundel County, within 2 miles of MD Route
295;
(ii) a location in Cecil County, within 2 miles of Interstate 95;
(iii) a location on State property associated with the Rocky Gap State
Park in Allegany County;
(iv) a location in Worcester County, within 1 mile of the intersection
of Route 50 and Route 589;
(v) a location in Baltimore City that is:

SENATE BILL 725 3
1. located:
A. in a nonresidential area;
B. within one–half mile of Interstate 95;
C. within one–half mile of MD Route 295; and
D. on property that is owned by Baltimore City on the date
on which the application for a video lottery operation license is submitted; and
2. not adjacent to or within one–quarter mile of property that
is:
A. zoned for residential use; and
B. used for a residential dwelling on the date the application
for a video lottery operation license is submitted; [or]
(vi) a location in Prince George’s County within a 4–mile radius of
the intersection of Bock Road and St. Barnabas Road; OR
(VII) SUBJECT TO § 16–105 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, A
LOCATION IN CHARLES COUNTY ON A VESSEL ON THE POTOMAC RIVER THAT CAN
BE ACCESSED BY THE PIER IN COLONIAL BEACH, VIRGINIA.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the
Video Lottery Facility Location Commission may not allocate more than the following
number of video lottery terminals for:
(i) a location in Anne Arundel County – 4,750 video lottery
terminals;
(ii) a location in Baltimore City – 3,750 video lottery terminals;
(iii) a location in Cecil County – 2,500 video lottery terminals;
(IV) A LOCATION IN CHARLES COUNTY – 1,500 VIDEO LOTTERY
TERMINALS;
[(iv)] (V) a location in Prince George’s County – 3,000 video lottery
terminals;
[(v)] (VI) a location in Rocky Gap State Park (Allegany County) –
1,500 video lottery terminals; and

SENATE BILL 725
[(vi)] (VII) a location in Worcester County – 2,500 video lottery
terminals.
(r) (1) Nothing in this subtitle may be construed to require the Video Lottery
Facility Location Commission to award all [six] SEVEN video lottery operation licenses
authorized under this subtitle.
(t) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Video
Lottery Facility Location Commission shall terminate on January 1, 2015.
(2) The Governor may reconstitute the Video Lottery Facility Location
Commission, which shall include the appointment of new members based on the criteria
established under subsections (b) and (c) of this section:
(i) one year prior to the expiration of a video lottery operation
license; [or]
(ii) following the revocation or surrender of a video lottery operation
license; OR
(III) FOR THE PURPOSE OF AWARDING A VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATION LICENSE IN CHARLES COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the provisions of Section 1 of
this Act authorize the Video Lottery Facility Location Commission to award one video
lottery operation license in Charles County with the authorization subject to a referendum
of the qualified voters of Maryland as provided in Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That before this Act, which
authorizes the additional forms or expansion of commercial gaming, becomes effective, it
shall first be submitted to a referendum of the qualified voters of the State at the general
election to be held in November 2026, in accordance with Article XIX, § 1(e) of the Maryland
Constitution. The State Board of Elections shall do those things necessary and proper to
provide for and hold the referendum required by this section. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “For the referred law”, this Act shall become effective on the 30th day
following the official canvass of votes for the referendum, but if a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “Against the referred law”, this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act and for the sole purpose of providing for the referendum required by Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.